Illinois, session 104th, SB2488.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Wildlife Code is amended by changing 5Sections 2.10 and 2.11 as follows: 6    (520 ILCS 5/2.10)  (from Ch. 61, par. 2.10)7    Sec. 2.10. The Department may, on an annual basis, 8establish a spring wild turkey open season within the period 9beginning on March 1 and running through May 31, and a fall 10wild turkey season within the period beginning on October 1 11and running through January 31. The Department may, on an 12annual basis, establish a youth-only spring wild turkey season 13which shall include 2 consecutive weekends. The daily time 14limits set by the Department for the taking of wild turkey 15during the wild turkey season shall be the same for youths and 16adults and shall begin no later than sunrise and end no earlier 17than sunset. It shall be unlawful for any person to take wild 18turkey without possessing a valid "Wild Turkey Hunting 19Permit". Persons holding a spring permit may take female wild 20turkeys with visible beards or male wild turkeys during the 21spring open season. Persons holding a fall permit may take 22turkeys of either sex during the fall open season. The 23Department shall cause notice of administrative rules setting   SB2488- 2 -LRB104 07395 BDA 17436 b1forth the prescribed rules and regulations, including those 2counties of the State where open seasons are established, to 3be given in accordance with Sections 1.3 and 1.13.4    The Department shall adopt rules to implement the 5provisions added to this Section and Section 2.11 by this 6amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 7(Source: P.A. 99-869, eff. 1-1-17.) 8    (520 ILCS 5/2.11)  (from Ch. 61, par. 2.11)9    Sec. 2.11. Before any person may lawfully hunt wild 10turkey, he shall first obtain a "Wild Turkey Hunting Permit" 11in accordance with the prescribed regulations set forth in an 12administrative rule of the Department. The fee for a Resident 13Wild Turkey Hunting Permit shall not exceed $15.14    Upon submitting suitable evidence of legal residence in 15any other state, non-residents shall be charged a fee not to 16exceed $125 for wild turkey hunting permits.17    The Department may by administrative rule allocate and 18issue non-resident Wild Turkey Permits and establish fees for 19such permits.20    Unfilled Wild Turkey Hunting Permits from a season may be 21carried over to any other wild turkey season in the same year. 22    It shall be unlawful to take wild turkey except by use of a 23bow and arrow or a shotgun of not larger than 10 gauge nor 24smaller than .410 bore. The Department may by administrative 25rule restrict shot size, material, or density. No person while   SB2488- 3 -LRB104 07395 BDA 17436 b1attempting to so take wild turkey may have in his possession 2any other gun unless in accordance with the Firearm Concealed 3Carry Act.4    It shall be unlawful to take, or attempt to take wild 5turkey except during the time from 1/2 hour before sunrise to 61/2 hour after sunset or during such lesser period of time as 7may be specified by administrative rule, during those days for 8which an open season is established.9    It shall be unlawful for any person to take, or attempt to 10take, wild turkey by use of dogs, horses, automobiles, 11aircraft or other vehicles, or conveyances, or by the use or 12aid of bait or baiting of any kind. For the purposes of this 13Section, "bait" means any material, whether liquid or solid, 14including food, salt, minerals, and other products, except 15pure water, that can be ingested, placed, or scattered in such 16a manner as to attract or lure wild turkeys. "Baiting" means 17the placement or scattering of bait to attract wild turkeys. 18An area is considered as baited during the presence of and for 1910 consecutive days following the removal of the bait. 20    It is unlawful for any person to take in Illinois or have 21in his possession more than one wild turkey per valid permit.22    For the purposes of calculating acreage under this 23Section, the Department shall, after determining the total 24acreage of the applicable tract or tracts of land, round 25remaining fractional portions of an acre greater than or equal 26to half of an acre up to the next whole acre.   SB2488- 4 -LRB104 07395 BDA 17436 b1    For the purposes of taking wild turkey, nothing in this 2Section shall be construed to prevent the manipulation, 3including mowing or cutting, of standing crops as a normal 4agricultural or soil stabilization practice, food plots, or 5normal agricultural practices, including planting, harvesting, 6and maintenance such as cultivating. Such manipulation for the 7purpose of taking wild turkey may be further modified by 8administrative rule. 9(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 103-622, eff. 1-1-25.)